Arkansas, session 2025, HB1628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-106(b), concerning the offenses for
which a court may issue an extended post-conviction no contact order, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) At the request of the prosecuting attorney, a court shall
determine whether to issue an extended post-conviction no contact order to a
person convicted of one (1) or more of the following offenses:
(1) Capital murder, § 5-10-101, or attempted capital murder;
(2) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, or attempted murder
in the first degree;
(3) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103, or attempted murder
in the second degree;
*CEB181*
02/27/2025 4:34:14 PM CEB181

HB1628
(4) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(5) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201;
(6) Battery in the second degree, § 5-13-202;
(7) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(8) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(9) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(10) Domestic battering in the first degree, § 5-26-303;
(10)(11) Domestic battering in the second degree, § 5-26-304; or
(11)(12) Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an
employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony.


























02/27/2025 4:34:14 PM CEB181